Colorado, session 2026A, HB1279.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-5-101, add (5) as
follows:
40-5-101. New construction - extension - compliance with local
zoning rules - landowner notice - definitions.
(5) (a) AT LEAST NINETY DAYS BEFORE BEGINNING THE
CONSTRUCTION OR EXTENSION OF A NEW FACILITY, LINE, PLANT, OR
SYSTEM, WHICH CONSTRUCTION OR EXTENSION WILL REQUIRE THE USE OF
PRIVATE REAL PROPERTY, A PUBLIC UTILITY SHALL PROVIDE SUFFICIENT
NOTICE TO EACH OWNER OF THE REAL PROPERTY THAT WILL BE USED,
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE REAL PROPERTY IS SUBJECT TO A UTILITY
EASEMENT.
(b) AT LEAST THIRTY DAYS AFTER, BUT NO LATER THAN SIXTY
DAYS AFTER, PROVIDING SUFFICIENT NOTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION, A PUBLIC UTILITY SHALL HOST AT
LEAST ONE IN-PERSON PUBLIC MEETING IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE
CONSTRUCTION OR EXTENSION WILL OCCUR.
(c) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (5), "SUFFICIENT NOTICE" MEANS
A LETTER SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL FROM OR ON BEHALF OF A PUBLIC
UTILITY TO AN OWNER OF REAL PROPERTY AND PUBLICATION IN A
NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION WITHIN THE AREA OF THE REAL
PROPERTY, WHICH LETTER AND PUBLICATION MUST INCLUDE:
-2- HB26-1279

(I) THE NAME, ADDRESS, TELEPHONE NUMBER, AND NAMED POINT
OF CONTACT FOR THE PUBLIC UTILITY;
(II) THE REAL PROPERTY ADDRESS;
(III) THE RECORDING NUMBER OF ANY UTILITY EASEMENT OR
RECORDED MEMORANDUM OF ANY UTILITY EASEMENT;
(IV) A GENERAL DESCRIPTION OF ANY EXISTING PUBLIC UTILITY
SERVICE INFRASTRUCTURE ALREADY LOCATED IN A RELEVANT UTILITY
EASEMENT AND THE APPROXIMATE LOCATION OF THE UTILITY EASEMENT;
(V) A CITATION TO THIS SECTION;
(VI) AN ESTIMATED TIME FOR THE START OF CONSTRUCTION;
(VII) A NOTICE THAT INTERESTED PERSONS MAY SUBMIT WRITTEN
COMMENTS TO THE PUBLIC UTILITY AT ANY TIME BEFORE THE START OF
CONSTRUCTION; AND
(VIII) THE DATE, TIME, AND LOCATION FOR THE PUBLIC MEETING
HOSTED BY THE PUBLIC UTILITY PURSUANT SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-3- HB26-1279

(2) This act applies to public utility construction or extension
projects commenced on or after the applicable effective date of this act.
-4- HB26-1279